Washington statutes.
RCW 12.20.020

Judgment by default.

When the defendant fails to appear and plead at the time specified in the notice, or within one hour thereafter, judgment shall be given as follows:

(1) When the defendant has been served with a true copy of the complaint, judgment shall be given without further evidence for the sum specified therein;

(2) In other cases, the justice shall hear the evidence of the plaintiff, and render judgment for such sum only as shall appear by the evidence to be just, but in no case exceed the amount specified in the complaint.

(3) The justice shall have full power at any time after a judgment has been given by default for failure of the defendant to appear and plead at the proper time, to vacate and set aside said judgment for any good cause and upon such terms as he or she shall deem sufficient and proper. Such judgment shall only be set aside upon five days notice in writing served upon the plaintiff or the plaintiff's attorney and filed with the justice within ten days after the entry of the judgment. The justice shall hear the application to set aside such judgment either upon affidavits or oral testimony as he or she may deem proper. In case such judgment is set aside the making of the application for setting the same aside shall be considered an entry of general appearance in the case by the applicant, and the case shall duly proceed to a trial upon the merits: PROVIDED, That, no justice of the peace shall pay out or turn over money or property received by him or her by virtue of any default judgment until the expiration of the ten days for moving to set aside such default judgment has expired.

[ 2010 c 8 s 3035; 1915 c 41 s 1; Code 1881 s 1781; 1873 p 349 s 79; 1863 p 349 s 62; 1854 p 237 s 81; RRS s 1858.]